Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4341.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 13. (1) Except as otherwise provided under federal law, an individual shall not receive services or grants or participate in any program under this act unless the individual is a United States citizen or a qualified alien. (2) As used in this section, "qualified alien" means that term as defined under 8 USC 1641.